Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-505
Forms authorized.

On or before January 1, 2002, the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice, the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety, the Attorney General, and the State Court Administrator may adopt and promulgate: (1) A form, in printed or electronic format, to be used by a law enforcement officer when making a motor vehicle stop to record personal identifying information about the operator of such motor vehicle, the location of the stop, the reason for the stop, and any other information that is required to be recorded pursuant to subsection (2) of section 20-504 and (2) a form, in printed or electronic format, to be used to report an allegation of racial profiling by a law enforcement officer.

Laws 2001, LB 593, § 5.